Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2528
Tenure.

(1) An employee in the classified service who has completed his probationary period shall have permanent tenure until he resigns voluntarily or is separated in accordance with the rules and regulations governing retirement, dismissal or layoff.

(2) An employee in the classified service with a probationary, provisional, temporary or emergency appointment shall have no tenure under that appointment and may be separated from employment by his appointing authority without any right of appeal except as provided in section 23-2531.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 12.